src/third-party/hunspell-dictionaries/es.dic
abundan/rt
abunden/rt
abundo/rt
agua/irh
aguda/r
ag  /irh
aguo/irGh
alc /rp
aliento/hrS
alimentaban/r
alimentad/rG
alimentando/r
alimenta/r
alimentaran/r
alimentara/r
alimentareis/r
aliment remos/r
alimentar /r
alimentar amos/r
alimentaron/r
alimentaseis/r
alimentase/r
alimentaste/r
alimenten/r
alimento/r
alzan/rp
alzar/RprDE
a adan/r
a ade/rGS
a adid/r
a adir/rRED
arad/rp
ara/pr
arcos/r
are/rSGpt
ar /pr
asa/r
ase/rSG
as /r
atomice/aS
baj is/ap
balance/aS
baleas/aS
balizar/RaDE
banderizad/a
ba as/aS
barbech /a
barquera/a
barran/irh
barremos/r
barrer n/r
barrer is/r
barrer ais/r
barrer an/r
barre/SGirh
barr a/rS
barrido/rGS
barrierais/r
barriera/r
barri remos/r
barrieron/r
barriesen/r
barrimos/r
barristeis/r
bastard /a
bastione/aGS
batas/apg
batojo/a
beban/irh
bebe/GSirh
beb a/hri
bestializado/aSG
bisela/a
bit /ap
bochorno/a
bofen/a
bolle/aGS
bordar/huRaDE
borrega/aS
brasa/Sa
brezo/Ga
bromen/ai
brucen/ga
bruzo/gGa
buz /a
caba a/aS
cachen/ia
cairelad/a
calabrot /a
callant /a
calza/rhSp
campad/hag
cantalea/a
cantaleasen/a
cante /ah
ca avere /a
capar /a
caree/SGa
cargaban/hpr
cargando/hpr
carg ramos/r
cargareis/rh
cargar /rph
cargarla/hr
carg semos/r
carg /rpih
caros/rh
catarro/a
cebadad/ai
cecine/GSa
cenan/r
cendro/ai
ceno/gGr
cepillen/a
cerqu /pha
chantad/a
charol /a
chinan/pia
choque/aj
cicate /a
cielo/rS
claman/aopg
clarezca/a
cobij /aih
coche/SGa
cogedor/SGpar
coger /jrbhi
coger a/bSirhj
cogerme/ri
cog amos/rbj
cogierais/brj
cogi remos/rj
cogimos/rhbji
cojamos/ijbhr
colchad/ha
comba/a
comet a/a
conchaba/hiSa
condicion /a
copad/a
copla/Sa
cordada/fShapi
cornear/ERaD
cortad/jGpa
cort /jap
cosos/a
cotar/RhaED
creced/hpgar
crecer /r
crecer ais/r
crec ais/r
creciendo/r
creciera/r
crecieron/r
creci /ragph
crezcamos/r
crib /a
crisole/aSG
cuadrilla/a
cuartela/a
cubierta/phrSi
cubil /a
cueste/aGSpi
cumulen/a
cu  /ap
curar/rRopDE
curo/opr
dame/Ga
dehes /ia
dentell /a
dicto/al
divinan/a
doctrinen/ak
dorabais/rh
dor is/hpr
doran/prah
doraran/hrp
dorar/aR   DE 
dorar /hpr
dor remos/r
dorar an/rh
dor semos/r
dor is/hpr
dor /rhap
dormitan/a
ductor/fSakpo
dulzore/aSG
entend a/tsrh
entiendo/trhs
exceder/RrED
exced /r
excitar/rRDE
excit /r
falagar/a
fil /iah
firmad/akfp
fluid/apkf
forr /a
frenada/rS
frenillan/a
fufar/RDaE
galla/ia
gane/aGShr
gan /rha
garb /ia
garrote/aiSG
gire/GSr
gorgojan/a
gravan/ah
guacha/a
guizga/ia
herida/r
hincad/aGh
hogar/aSp
hora/rSh
huevan/a
impreso/pGSr
imprime/rGSp
imprimir/rRDpE
jornala/a
justa/kSa
lam n/aGS
lardear/ERaD
leche/aSi
lecho/rS
letea/aS
ligu /hiapf
li /ah
llenar/rRpED
llen /pr
llev /fr
lobado/aGS
lumbrada/fSpah
machetee/SGa
manad/oahp
manera/ra
ma o/aG
marrad/ga
mechen/a
mel /hia
miele/iSGha
mir/aS
mohezco/ai
mole/aSk
montazgar/aRDE
morqu /a
mov a/opaf
municionad/a
nadan/r
nad /r
naranjado/aGS
nublan/a
paleen/a
parare/pSGag
pareo/a
parto/Srp
pasaba/rShpo
pas ndolo/rGS
pasara/hrpo
pasar /oprh
pasaremos/r
pasar ais/r
pasarlo/rGSp
pasaros/rpo
pas semos/r
pasaste/rpho
pas /orph
paste/aSGip
pegar /iha
pelotones/a
perdig /iah
pierna/jSha
pintabais/hr
pintad/pGrh
pintan/prh
pintar n/hpr
pintar is/rh
pintare/prSGh
pintar a/pShr
pint semos/r
pintaste/rph
pint /prh
pitad/a
planch /ah
plegu /hap
ponernos/korl
poni ndola/rt
porqu /ai
posar/pRhDaE
precio/ahSr
premiador/aGS
preste/aGSi
prob /ap
puesto/aSGltkrunopg
pujanza/Sr
pujen/rip
punch /a
quejad/hGa
quilatad/ah
rene/Sa
ru en/a
sabido/rSGf
saineteen/a
salgo/pr
sal /rp
salt bamos/r
salt is/pr
salt ndoos/r
saltarais/r
saltar s/pr
salt remos/r
saltar amos/r
saltarnos/r
saltaseis/r
saltasteis/r
salt /rap
sana/kpsrS
sane/pGSsr
sedar/aRED
sembr /rp
senderear/RaED
serien/ai
siembro/pr
signar/RDapgfE
solador/Sfag
sole is/a
son /apf
suelan/sfrag
surcan/ag
tajaderos/a
taos/af
tarde/rSp
tarquinada/iaS
tenacear/RaDE
tened/fjagp
testan/oigafk
tilden/a
tomiza/iSa
trabajan/a
trafagan/a
traje/pgfa
trinchera/a
tumultuar/aRD
vallar/RaDE
veedor/poSr
vena/aSjoph
verted/pr
veste/rS
viaria/a
vidriera/rS
vierta/frpks
vinagre/iSa
viste/ikrnGajhp
viva/hrafpq
viv a/fhpr
vivir/rRDfEhp
vol /pr
vos/a
zorro/aG
